Nebraska, session 109, LB464.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB464 LB464
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and sections 2 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the
Nebraska Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 2 to 5 of this act:
(1) Aggregated retail market value means the total combined value of
all retail merchandise involved in a transaction, series of transactions,
occurrence, series of occurrences, or course of conduct which constitutes
a violation of this section. Such value shall be calculated based on the
price at which the retail merchandise would ordinarily be sold by a
retailer in the ordinary course of business. If the value cannot be
reasonably ascertained in such manner, the value shall be calculated
based on the cost of replacing the retail merchandise within a reasonable
period after a violation of this section;
(2) Organized retail crime means the theft of retail merchandise
with the intent or purpose of:
(a) Reselling, distributing, or otherwise reentering the retail
merchandise in commerce; or
(b) Transferring the stolen retail merchandise to another retailer
or to any other person in exchange for anything of value;
(3) Retail commerce means the sale of articles, products,
commodities, items, or components to the public for use or consumption
rather than for resale;
(4) Retail merchandise means any article, product, commodity, item,
or component intended to be sold in retail commerce; and
(5) Retailer means a person that sells or facilitates the sale of
retail merchandise.
Sec. 3. A person commits the offense of organized retail crime when
that person, acting alone or in association with another person, does any
of the following:
-2-

LB464 LB464
2025 2025
(1) Knowingly commits an organized retail crime;
(2) Organizes, supervises, finances, or otherwise manages or assists
another person in committing an organized retail crime;
(3) Removes, destroys, deactivates, or knowingly evades any
component of an antishoplifting or inventory-control device to prevent
the activation of that device or to facilitate another person in
committing an organized retail crime;
(4) Conspires with another person to commit an organized retail
crime;
(5) Receives, purchases, or possesses retail merchandise for sale or
resale if a reasonable person would know such retail merchandise to be
stolen;
(6) Uses any artifice, instrument, container, device, or other
article to facilitate the commission of an organized retail crime act; or
(7) Knowingly causes a fire exit alarm to sound or otherwise
activate, or deactivates or prevents a fire exit alarm from sounding, in
the commission of an organized retail crime or to facilitate the
commission of an organized retail crime by another person.
Sec. 4. (1) A violation of section 3 of this act shall be a:
(a) Class IIA felony when the aggregated retail market value of the
retail merchandise involved is five thousand dollars or more;
(b) Class IV felony when the aggregated retail market value of the
retail merchandise involved is one thousand five hundred dollars or more
but less than five thousand dollars; and
(c) Class I misdemeanor when the aggregated retail market value of
the retail merchandise involved is more than five hundred dollars but
less than one thousand five hundred dollars.
(2) A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (1)(c) of
this section shall be a Class IV felony.
(3) For a prior conviction to be used to enhance the penalty under
subsection (2) of this section, the prior conviction must have occurred
-3-

LB464 LB464
2025 2025
no more than ten years prior to the date of commission of the current
offense.
(4) The aggregated retail market value of amounts taken pursuant to
one organized retail crime scheme from one or more persons may be
aggregated in the same indictment, information, or complaint in
determining the classification of the offense, except that amounts shall
not be aggregated into more than one offense.
(5) In any prosecution of a violation of section 3 of this act,
aggregate retail market value shall be an essential element of the
offense that must be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.
Sec. 5. It is not a defense to a violation of section 3 of this act
that the retail merchandise was not stolen, embezzled, or converted
property at the time of the violation if the retail merchandise was
explicitly represented as being stolen, embezzled, or converted property.
Sec. 6. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-